Hawaii statutes.
[§168-4] Preference. To the extent
that the same may be necessary from time to time for the satisfaction of their
water needs, domestic and agricultural, the Hawaiian homes commission and
lessees of the Hawaiian homes commission shall at all times, upon actual need
therefor being shown to the board of agriculture, have a prior right to
two-thirds of the water developed for the Molokai irrigation and water
utilization project by the tunnel development extending to Waikolu valley and
ground water developed west of Waikolu valley, which was planned by the board
of land and natural resources as the first stage of the Molokai irrigation
project. [L 1987, c 306, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next